Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2537
Municipal Initiative and Referendum Act; inapplicability.

Nothing in the Municipal Initiative and Referendum Act shall apply to procedures for initiatives or referendums provided in sections 14-210 to 14-212 relating to cities of the metropolitan class, sections 18-412 and 18-412.02 relating to municipal light and power plants, sections 70-504 and 70-650.01 relating to public power districts, and sections 80-203 to 80-205 relating to soldiers and sailors monuments.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 37;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 188.